District of Columbia statutes.
43-106

Application of proceeds of sales of lots.

The proceeds arising from the sale of lots, after deducting all expenses of purchasing and laying out the same, shall be applied, appropriated, and used in improving and ornamenting the burial ground, or for other purposes named in §§ 43-101 to 43-114, 43-116 to 43-118, 43-119 to 43-128.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1294, ch. 854, § 662

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 27-106.
1973 Ed., § 27-106.